Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-10,107
Appeal; procedure.

All decisions and findings of the Director of Insurance made under sections 44-1072 to 44-10,109 may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1985, LB 508, § 36;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 56.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.